Massachusetts, session 194th, H73.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 91 of Chapter 231 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end the following new paragraph:-
A plaintiff with the intent of filing against a defendant under this section, but is unable to
do so because of a lack of a real name of the person committing the act and said real name is
being held by a third party who provides the forum, which includes, but not limited to, paper,
Internet and Telecommunications, by which the defendant is able to commit such an act. The
third party shall release the name, address and relative contact information to the plaintiff within
ten days of the plaintiff’s request; provided that the plaintiff states the intent is the file an action
against the defendant under this section. Should the third party not comply with the plaintiff’s
request, the plaintiff may seek a court order from district court, seeking the third party to release
of 2

the information, so the plaintiff can initiate a filing against a defendant. The district court may
impose penalties for non-compliance of a court order on the third party if there is no compliance.
of 2